District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.03

Mandatory source separation.

(a)

(1)

Solid waste in the District shall be separated at the point of discard into the following categories:

(A)

Recyclable materials;

(B)

Compostable materials; and

(C)

Trash.

(2)

Paragraph (1)(B) of this subsection shall apply upon the Mayor’s implementation of a compost collection program; provided, that the Mayor may require that private collection properties or subcategories of private collection properties separate compostable materials before the implementation of a compost collection program.

(b)

The Mayor shall make public a list of recyclable materials, and, upon the implementation of a compost collection program established by the Mayor, compostable materials. The Mayor shall review the list on a biannual basis to determine whether additional materials should be added or removed.

(c)

By January 1, 2016, the Mayor shall submit a report to the Secretary of the Council regarding the feasibility of and progress made toward implementing a compost collection program.

(d)

The Mayor may establish a uniform color, design, and labeling scheme for public collection property waste containers in the District.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 103, 61 DCR 9971
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-154, § 401, see § 6 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-154, § 401, see § 9 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-164, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13734).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-154, § 401, see § 4 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-292, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1211).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-154: Section 401 of D.C. Law 20-154 provided that § 103(c) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.